csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_Cnj_VV.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaasininiigwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaasinoogwen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininiigwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinoogwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaanigwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaagwen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atenigwen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: ategwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiinigwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiigwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaasininigobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaasinoogobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atesininigobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atesinoogobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininigobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinoogobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaanigobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaagobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atenigobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: ategobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiinigobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiigobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaasininig
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaasinog
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atesininig
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atesinog
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininig
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinog
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaanig
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaag
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atenig
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: ateg
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiinig
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiig
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaasininigiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaasinoogiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atesininigiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atesinoogiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininigiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinoogiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaanigiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaagiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atenigiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: ategiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiinigiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiigiban
